Nevada, session 83, AB395.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 449 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health facility that is located in a county whose
population is 20,000 or more shall notify each person who is deaf
or hard of hearing and seeks care or services at the health facility:
(a) That a qualified sign language interpreter can be made
available to assist the person;
(b) That the person may request an in-person or remote
qualified sign language interpreter; and
(c) Of any other specific accommodations that may be
available for the person.
2. If a person who is deaf or hard of hearing seeks health
care from a health facility that is located in a county whose
population is 20,000 or more and requests an in-person qualified
sign language interpreter:
(a) At least 48 hours before a prescheduled encounter at a
health facility or at least 2 hours after arriving at a health facility
-
*AB395_R1*

– 3 –
that is a hospital for an unplanned inpatient hospitalization, the
health facility shall provide an in-person qualified sign language
interpreter.
(b) In circumstances other than those described in paragraph
(a), the health facility shall:
(1) Make a good faith effort to provide an in-person
qualified sign language interpreter;
(2) Provide an in-person qualified sign language
interpreter if the health facility is able to do so after making a
good faith effort;
(3) Provide a qualified sign language interpreter remotely
using audiovisual communication technology in a manner that
meets the requirements of subsections 4 and 5 if the health facility
is unable to provide an in-person qualified sign language
interpreter after making a good faith effort; and
(4) Maintain in the medical record of the person
documentation of the good faith effort made pursuant to
subparagraph (1), which must include, without limitation:
(I) A list of entities contacted to provide an in-person
qualified sign language interpreter and a statement of the manner
in which each such entity responded;
(II) A statement of whether the health facility provided
an in-person qualified sign language interpreter or provided a
qualified sign language interpreter remotely using audiovisual
communication technology; and
(III) If applicable, the time at which a qualified sign
language interpreter was available in person to assist the person.
3. If a person who is deaf or hard of hearing seeks health
care from a health facility that is located in a county whose
population is 20,000 or more and requests that the health facility
provide:
(a) A qualified sign language interpreter remotely using
audiovisual communication technology, the health facility shall
provide a qualified sign language interpreter remotely using
audiovisual communication technology in a manner that meets the
requirements of subsections 4 and 5.
(b) Any type of accommodation other than a qualified sign
language interpreter, the health facility may provide the
accommodation.
4. If a health facility that is located in a county whose
population is 20,000 or more provides a qualified sign language
interpreter remotely using audiovisual communication technology,
the audiovisual communication technology must:
(a) Provide clear transmission of audio and visuals; and
(b) Be capable of hands-free use.
-
*AB395_R1*

– 4 –
5. A qualified sign language interpreter who provides remote
sign language interpreting pursuant to this section must:
(a) Interpret from a dedicated secure call center that ensures
the privacy of the person who is deaf or hard of hearing; and
(b) Comply with the provisions of the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191,
and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
6. A health facility that is located in a county whose
population is 20,000 or more shall provide training to an
employee, a contractor or a volunteer who is involved in using
audiovisual communication technology to facilitate the use of a
remote qualified sign language interpreter. Such training must be
adequate to ensure that the employee, contractor or volunteer
operates the technology efficiently and effectively.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Health facility” means a medical facility, a facility for the
dependent or a facility which is required by the regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(c) “Qualified sign language interpreter” means a qualified
interpreter for an individual with a disability, as defined in 45
C.F.R. § 92.4, who is registered pursuant to NRS 656A.100 to
practice sign language interpreting in a community setting.
(d) “Secure call center” means a location with the physical
and technological capability to provide qualified sign language
interpreters remotely using audiovisual communication
technology in compliance with this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 449.029 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.029 As used in NRS 449.029 to 449.240, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, “medical
facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.0151 and
includes a program of hospice care described in NRS 449.196.
Sec. 3. NRS 449.0301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.0301 The provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act do not apply to:
1. Any facility conducted by and for the adherents of any
church or religious denomination for the purpose of providing
facilities for the care and treatment of the sick who depend solely
upon spiritual means through prayer for healing in the practice of
the religion of the church or denomination, except that such a
facility shall comply with all regulations relative to sanitation and
safety applicable to other facilities of a similar category.
2. Foster homes as defined in NRS 424.014.
-
*AB395_R1*

– 5 –
3. Any medical facility, facility for the dependent or facility
which is otherwise required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed that is operated and
maintained by the United States Government or an agency thereof.
Sec. 4. NRS 449.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.160 1. The Division may deny an application for a
license or may suspend or revoke any license issued under the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act upon any of the following grounds:
(a) Violation by the applicant or the licensee of any of the
provisions of NRS 439B.410, 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act or 449A.100 to 449A.124, inclusive, and
449A.270 to 449A.286, inclusive, or of any other law of this State
or of the standards, rules and regulations adopted thereunder.
(b) Aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal
act.
(c) Conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare and
safety of the people of the State of Nevada in the maintenance and
operation of the premises for which a license is issued.
(d) Conduct or practice detrimental to the health or safety of the
occupants or employees of the facility.
(e) Failure of the applicant to obtain written approval from the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services as
required by NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102 or as provided in any
regulation adopted pursuant to NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act and 449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and
chapter 449A of NRS if such approval is required, including,
without limitation, the closure or conversion of any hospital in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more that is owned by the
licensee without approval pursuant to NRS 439A.102.
(f) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto or NRS 449.2486.
(g) Violation of the provisions of NRS 458.112.
(h) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 449A.170 to
449A.192, inclusive, and any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
(i) Violation of the provisions of NRS 629.260.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1, the Division
may revoke a license to operate a facility for the dependent if, with
respect to that facility, the licensee that operates the facility, or an
agent or employee of the licensee:
(a) Is convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 202.470;
(b) Is ordered to but fails to abate a nuisance pursuant to NRS
244.360, 244.3603 or 268.4124; or
-
*AB395_R1*

– 6 –
(c) Is ordered by the appropriate governmental agency to correct
a violation of a building, safety or health code or regulation but fails
to correct the violation.
3. The Division shall maintain a log of any complaints that it
receives relating to activities for which the Division may revoke the
license to operate a facility for the dependent pursuant to subsection
2. The Division shall provide to a facility for the care of adults
during the day:
(a) A summary of a complaint against the facility if the
investigation of the complaint by the Division either substantiates
the complaint or is inconclusive;
(b) A report of any investigation conducted with respect to the
complaint; and
(c) A report of any disciplinary action taken against the facility.
 The facility shall make the information available to the public
pursuant to NRS 449.2486.
4. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau a written report setting forth, for the previous biennium:
(a) Any complaints included in the log maintained by the
Division pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Any disciplinary actions taken by the Division pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 5. NRS 449.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.163 1. In addition to the payment of the amount required
by NRS 449.0308, if a medical facility, facility for the dependent or
facility which is required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed violates any provision
related to its licensure, including any provision of NRS 439B.410 or
449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of this act or any
condition, standard or regulation adopted by the Board, the
Division, in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 449.165, may:
(a) Prohibit the facility from admitting any patient until it
determines that the facility has corrected the violation;
(b) Limit the occupancy of the facility to the number of beds
occupied when the violation occurred, until it determines that the
facility has corrected the violation;
(c) If the license of the facility limits the occupancy of the
facility and the facility has exceeded the approved occupancy,
require the facility, at its own expense, to move patients to another
facility that is licensed;
(d) Except where a greater penalty is authorized by subsection 2,
impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 per day
-
*AB395_R1*

– 7 –
for each violation, together with interest thereon at a rate not to
exceed 10 percent per annum; and
(e) Appoint temporary management to oversee the operation of
the facility and to ensure the health and safety of the patients of the
facility, until:
(1) It determines that the facility has corrected the violation
and has management which is capable of ensuring continued
compliance with the applicable statutes, conditions, standards and
regulations; or
(2) Improvements are made to correct the violation.
2. If an off-campus location of a hospital fails to obtain a
national provider identifier that is distinct from the national provider
identifier used by the main campus and any other off-campus
location of the hospital in violation of NRS 449.1818, the Division
may impose against the hospital an administrative penalty of not
more than $10,000 for each day of such failure, together with
interest thereon at a rate not to exceed 10 percent per annum, in
addition to any other action authorized by this chapter.
3. If the facility fails to pay any administrative penalty imposed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2, the
Division may:
(a) Suspend the license of the facility until the administrative
penalty is paid; and
(b) Collect court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other
costs incurred to collect the administrative penalty.
4. The Division may require any facility that violates any
provision of NRS 439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act or any condition, standard or regulation adopted
by the Board to make any improvements necessary to correct the
violation.
5. Any money collected as administrative penalties pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 must be accounted for
separately and used to administer and carry out the provisions of
NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive, and section 1 of this act,
449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and chapter 449A of NRS to protect
the health, safety, well-being and property of the patients and
residents of facilities in accordance with applicable state and federal
standards or for any other purpose authorized by the Legislature.
Sec. 6. NRS 449.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.240 The district attorney of the county in which the facility
is located shall, upon application by the Division, institute and
conduct the prosecution of any action for violation of any provisions
of NRS 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
-
*AB395_R1*

– 8 –
Sec. 7. NRS 449.2488 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.2488 1. The Department of Health and Human Services
shall develop a brochure and website to assist persons who are 55
years of age or older in determining the appropriate level of care and
type of housing that they require to meet their individual needs. The
brochure and website must include, without limitation:
(a) The various types of housing and levels of care that are
available to persons who are 55 years of age or older, including,
without limitation, residential facilities for groups, facilities for
intermediate care and facilities for skilled nursing, distinguishing the
varying degree of services that are offered by the different types of
facilities;
(b) Whether individual facilities accept payment through
Medicaid or Medicare for the level of care and type of housing that
the facilities provide;
(c) The manner in which a person may obtain information
concerning whether the facility has ever been found to have violated
the provisions of this chapter; and
(d) Such other information as the Department deems to be
beneficial to persons who are 55 years of age or older in
determining the appropriate level of care and type of housing that
they require to meet their individual needs.
2. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
maintain on an Internet website maintained by the Department
and update at least annually a list of assisted living facilities and
senior living communities that provide services specialized for
persons who are deaf or hard of hearing.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Assisted living facility” means a facility that has staff at
the facility available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, to provide
scheduled assisted living supportive services and assisted living
supportive services that are required in an emergency in a manner
that promotes maximum dignity and independence of the residents
of the facility.
(b) “Assisted living supportive services” means services which
are provided at an assisted living facility to residents of the
assisted living facility, including, without limitation:
(1) Personal care services;
(2) Homemaker services;
(3) Chore services;
(4) Attendant care;
(5) Companion services;
(6) Medication oversight;
(7) Therapeutic, social and recreational programming; and
-
*AB395_R1*

– 9 –
(8) Services which ensure that the residents of the facility
are safe, secure and adequately supervised.
(c) “Medicaid” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 439B.120.
[(b)] (d) “Medicare” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 439B.130.
Sec. 8. Chapter 629 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A provider of health care who is providing care in a county
whose population is 20,000 or more shall ensure that each person
who is deaf or hard of hearing and seeks health care from the
provider of health care is notified:
(a) That a qualified sign language interpreter can be made
available to assist the person;
(b) That the person may request an in-person or remote
qualified sign language interpreter; and
(c) Of any other specific accommodations that may be
available for the person.
2. If a person who is deaf or hard of hearing seeks health
care from a provider of health care who is providing care in a
county whose population is 20,000 or more and requests an in-
person qualified sign language interpreter:
(a) At least 48 hours before a prescheduled encounter with the
provider of health care, the provider of health care shall provide
an in-person qualified sign language interpreter.
(b) In circumstances other than those described in paragraph
(a), the provider of health care shall:
(1) Make a good faith effort to provide an in-person
qualified sign language interpreter;
(2) Provide an in-person qualified sign language
interpreter if the provider of health care is able to do so after
making a good faith effort;
(3) Provide a qualified sign language interpreter remotely
using audiovisual communication technology in a manner that
meets the requirements of subsections 4 and 5 if the provider of
health care is unable to provide an in-person qualified sign
language interpreter after making a good faith effort; and
(4) Maintain in the medical record of the person
documentation of the good faith effort made pursuant to
subparagraph (1), which must include, without limitation:
(I) A list of entities contacted to provide an in-person
qualified sign language interpreter and a statement of the manner
in which each such entity responded;
(II) A statement of whether the provider of health care
provided an in-person qualified sign language interpreter or
-
*AB395_R1*

– 10 –
provided a qualified sign language interpreter remotely using
audiovisual communication technology; and
(III) If applicable, the time at which a qualified sign
language interpreter was available in person to assist the person.
3. If a person who is deaf or hard of hearing seeks health
care from a provider of health care who is providing care in a
county whose population is 20,000 or more and requests that the
provider of health care provide:
(a) A qualified sign language interpreter remotely using
audiovisual communication technology, the provider of health
care shall provide a qualified sign language interpreter remotely
using audiovisual communication technology in a manner that
meets the requirements of subsections 4 and 5.
(b) Any type of accommodation other than a qualified sign
language interpreter, the provider of health care may provide the
accommodation.
4. If a provider of health care who is providing care in a
county whose population is 20,000 or more provides a qualified
sign language interpreter remotely using audiovisual
communication technology, the audiovisual communication
technology must:
(a) Provide clear transmission of audio and visuals; and
(b) Be capable of hands-free use.
5. A qualified sign language interpreter who provides remote
sign language interpreting pursuant to this section must:
(a) Interpret from a dedicated and secure call center that
ensures the privacy of the person who is deaf or hard of hearing;
and
(b) Comply with the provisions of the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191,
and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
6. A provider of health care who is providing care in a county
whose population is 20,000 or more shall provide training to an
employee, a contractor or a volunteer who is involved in using
audiovisual communication technology to facilitate the use of a
remote qualified sign language interpreter. Such training must be
adequate to ensure that the employee, contractor or volunteer
operates the technology efficiently and effectively.
7. A provider of health care who violates any provision of this
section is guilty of unprofessional conduct and is subject to
disciplinary action by the board, agency or other entity in this
State by which he or she is licensed, certified or registered.
8. The provisions of this section do not apply to a person who
holds a license as an attendant or who is certified as an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or
-
*AB395_R1*

– 11 –
paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS or authorized to
practice as an emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic in this State under
the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel
Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Qualified sign language interpreter” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 1 of this act.
(b) “Secure call center” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 1 of this act.
Sec. 9. NRS 654.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
654.190 1. The Board may, after notice and an opportunity
for a hearing as required by law, impose an administrative fine of
not more than $10,000 for each violation on, recover reasonable
investigative fees and costs incurred from, suspend, revoke, deny
the issuance or renewal of or place conditions on the license of, and
place on probation or impose any combination of the foregoing on
any licensee who:
(a) Is convicted of a felony relating to the practice of
administering a facility for skilled nursing or facility for
intermediate care or residential facility for groups or of any offense
involving moral turpitude.
(b) Has obtained his or her license by the use of fraud or deceit.
(c) Violates any of the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Aids or abets any person in the violation of any of the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act or 449A.100 to 449A.124, inclusive, and 449A.270 to
449A.286, inclusive, as those provisions pertain to a facility for
skilled nursing, facility for intermediate care or residential facility
for groups.
(e) Violates any regulation of the Board prescribing additional
standards of conduct for licensees, including, without limitation, a
code of ethics.
(f) Engages in conduct that violates the trust of a patient or
resident or exploits the relationship between the licensee and the
patient or resident for the financial or other gain of the licensee.
2. If a licensee requests a hearing pursuant to subsection 1, the
Board shall give the licensee written notice of a hearing pursuant to
NRS 233B.121 and 241.0333. A licensee may waive, in writing, his
or her right to attend the hearing.
3. The Board may compel the attendance of witnesses or the
production of documents or objects by subpoena. The Board may
adopt regulations that set forth a procedure pursuant to which the
Chair of the Board may issue subpoenas on behalf of the Board.
Any person who is subpoenaed pursuant to this subsection may
-
*AB395_R1*

– 12 –
request the Board to modify the terms of the subpoena or grant
additional time for compliance.
4. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact and
conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
5. The expiration of a license by operation of law or by order
or decision of the Board or a court, or the voluntary surrender of a
license, does not deprive the Board of jurisdiction to proceed with
any investigation of, or action or disciplinary proceeding against, the
licensee or to render a decision suspending or revoking the license.
Sec. 10. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 11. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 10, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB395_R1*